Connecticut, session 2026, SB00105.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to eliminate (1) occupational
license fees for speech and language pathologists, (2) license, permit,
certification and registration fees for occupations and professions
regulated by the Department of Consumer Protection, and (3)
certification fees for teaching certificates.